Vermont, session 2025-2026, H734.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. SHORT TITLE
This act may be cited as the “Vermont Nonprofit Advocacy Transparency
and Accountability Act of 2026.”
VT LEG #386654 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.734
2026 Page 2 of 7
Sec. 2. PURPOSE
The purpose of this act is to strengthen transparency, accountability, and
fair play in the political and advocacy activities of nonprofit organizations
operating in Vermont, particularly those engaging in issue advocacy,
grassroots lobbying, influencing public policy, and elections.
Sec. 3. 17 V.S.A. § 2901 is amended to read:
§ 2901. DEFINITIONS
As used in this chapter:
(1) “Advocacy organization” means any entity exempt under 26 U.S.C.
§ 501(c) that spends more than $10,000.00 per year on issue advocacy,
grassroots lobbying, public policy, or election campaigns related to Vermont.
(2) “Affiliated entity” means an entity that shares staff, board members,
office space, or financial resources with another nonprofit.
(3) “Candidate” means an individual who has taken affirmative action to
become a candidate for State, county, local, or legislative office in a primary,
special, general, or local election. An affirmative action shall include one or
more of the following:
* * *
(2)(4) “Candidate’s committee” means the candidate’s campaign staff,
whether paid or unpaid.
(3)(5) “Clearly identified,” with respect to a candidate, means:
VT LEG #386654 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.734
2026 Page 3 of 7
* * *
(4)(6) “Contribution” means a payment, distribution, advance, deposit,
loan, or gift of money or anything of value, paid or promised to be paid for the
purpose of influencing an election, advocating a position on a public question,
or supporting or opposing one or more candidates in any election. As used in
this chapter, “contribution” shall not include any of the following:
* * *
(5)(7) “Election” means the procedure whereby the voters of this State
or any of its political subdivisions select a person to be a candidate for public
office or to fill a public office or to act on public questions, including voting on
constitutional amendments. Each primary, general, special, or local election
shall constitute a separate election.
(6)(8) “Electioneering communication” means any communication that
refers to a clearly identified candidate for office and that promotes or supports
a candidate for that office or attacks or opposes a candidate for that office,
regardless of whether the communication expressly advocates a vote for or
against a candidate, including communications published in any newspaper or
periodical or broadcast on radio or television or over the internet or any public
address system; placed on any billboards, outdoor facilities, buttons, or printed
material attached to motor vehicles, window displays, posters, cards,
VT LEG #386654 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.734
2026 Page 4 of 7
pamphlets, leaflets, flyers, or other circulars; or contained in any direct
mailing, robotic phone calls, or mass electronic or digital communications.
(7)(9) “Expenditure” means a payment, disbursement, distribution,
advance, deposit, loan, or gift of money or anything of value, paid or promised
to be paid, for the purpose of influencing an election, advocating a position on
a public question, or supporting or opposing one or more candidates.
* * *
(8)(10) “Four-year general election cycle” means the 48-month period
that begins 38 days after a general election for a four-year-term office.
(9)(11) “Full name” means an individual’s full first name, middle name
or initial, if any, and full legal last name, making the identity of the person who
made the contribution apparent by unambiguous reference.
(12) “Grassroots lobbying” means the act of urging the public, via
media or mass communications, to contact legislators to influence legislation,
public policy, or election outcomes.
(10)(13) “Independent expenditure-only political committee” means any
one or more individuals, or any corporation, labor organization, public interest
group, or other entity, excluding a political party, that accepts contributions or
makes expenditures in any amounts within any two-year general election cycle
for the purpose of supporting or opposing candidates, influencing an election,
or advocating for or against a public question; conducts its activities entirely
VT LEG #386654 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.734
2026 Page 5 of 7
independent of candidates; does not give contributions to candidates, political
committees, or political parties; does not make related expenditures; and is not
closely related to a political party or to a political committee that makes
contributions to candidates or makes related expenditures. “Independent
expenditure-only political committee” includes any “self-funded individual,”
meaning an individual who receives no contributions from any other source for
the purpose of supporting or opposing candidates, influencing an election, or
advocating for or against a public question.
(11)(14) “Mass media activity” means a television commercial, radio
commercial, internet advertisement, mass mailing, mass electronic or digital
communication, literature drop, newspaper or periodical advertisement, robotic
phone call, or telephone bank, that includes the name or likeness of a clearly
identified candidate for office.
(12)(15) “Party candidate listing” means any communication by a
political party that:
* * *
(13)(16) “Political committee” or “political action committee” means
any formal or informal committee of one or more individuals or a corporation,
labor organization, public interest group, or other entity, not including a
political party, that accepts contributions or makes expenditures in any
amounts in any two-year general election cycle for the purpose of supporting
VT LEG #386654 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.734
2026 Page 6 of 7
or opposing one or more candidates, influencing an election, or advocating a
position on a public question in any election, and includes a legislative
leadership political committee.
(14)(17) “Political party” means a political party organized under
chapter 45 of this title and any committee established, financed, maintained, or
controlled by the party, including any subsidiary, branch, or local unit thereof,
and shall be considered a single, unified political party. The national affiliate
of the political party shall be considered a separate political party.
(15)(18) “Public question” means an issue that is before the voters for a
binding decision.
(16)(19) “Single source” means an individual, partnership, corporation,
association, labor organization, or any other organization or group of persons
that is not a political committee or political party.
(17)(20) “Telephone bank” means more than 500 telephone calls of an
identical or substantially similar nature that are made to the general public
within any 30-day period.
(18)(21) “Two-year general election cycle” means the 24-month period
that begins 38 days after a general election.
(19)(22) “Legislative leadership political committee” means a political
committee established by or on behalf of a political party caucus within a
chamber of the General Assembly.
VT LEG #386654 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.734
2026 Page 7 of 7
Sec. 4. 17 V.S.A. § 2974 is added to read:
§ 2974. PUBLIC REPORTING BY ADVOCACY ORGANIZATIONS;
AUDITS
(a) Any advocacy organization expending more than $10,000.00 annually
on Vermont-focused issue advocacy or grassroots lobbying shall:
(1) file, on a quarterly basis, reports with the Secretary of State listing:
(A) the total amount expended on advertisements, mailers, digital
media, and canvassing;
(B) donors who contributed over $1,000.00 during the reporting
period; and
(C) the names of any affiliated entities; and
(2) include on all public communications a disclaimer reading:
“Paid for by [organization name], not authorized by any candidate.”
(b) Advocacy organizations that either receive or earn annual revenue over
$1,000,000.00 shall perform an audit of their finances, at minimum,
biannually. The organization shall file the results of these audits with the
Secretary of State within three months after completion.
(c) The Secretary of State shall design and make available any form
required by this section.
Sec. 5. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #386654 v.1